Wyoming statutes. Title 29 Liens
Chapter 10 Forms

Effective date. —

Laws 2010, ch. 92, § 5, makes the act effective July 1, 2011.

§ 29-10-101.
Preliminary notice of right to lien; lien waiver form.

Preliminary notice of right to a lien shall be sent to the record owner of the property against which the lien may be filed and shall be completed in substantially the following form:

Note to Lien Claimant: This form, if filled out correctly and sent within the time periods specified in , constitutes prima facie evidence that you have provided the content of the notice required by . If you have any questions regarding how to fill out this form or whether it has been filled out properly, you should consult a attorney. W.S.

29-2-112

W.S.

29-2-112

(a)(i) NOTICE TO OWNER The undersigned party is providing work or materials to the property described below. Failure of payment due and owing to a contractor, subcontractor or materialman for work performed or materials provided to the project located on the property can result in the filing of a lien against the property. To avoid this result, when paying for labor and materials you may ask the contractor, subcontractor or materialman for “lien waivers” from all persons supplying materials or services. Failure to secure lien waivers may result in your paying for labor and materials twice. A form of lien waiver is attached to this notice. Name, address and telephone number of contractor, subcontractor or materialman, and contact person: MATERIALS PROVIDED OR WORK PERFORMED: PROPERTY DESCRIPTION: ADDRESS: LEGAL DESCRIPTION: SIGNED: DATE:

Click to view

The form for waiver of a lien shall be completed in substantially the following form:

Note to lien claimant: Signing this form has legal implications. If you have any questions regarding how to complete this form or whether it has been properly completed, you should consult an attorney. LIEN WAIVER TO:
PROJECT: FROM: DATE: PAYMENT: $ In consideration of the PAYMENT received to date, the undersigned does hereby waive, release, and relinquish any and all claim and/or right of lien against the project and the real property improvements thereto for labor and/or materials furnished for use in construction of the project; provided however, the undersigned reserves all claims and/or rights of lien as to monies withheld as retainage in the amount of $, and any labor and/or materials hereafter furnished for which payment has not yet been made. The undersigned has not been paid the sum of $ for work performed and/or materials provided under contract on this project and retains the right to file a lien against the property and pursue any and all actions to recover the full amount due, including any and all equitable claims. The undersigned acknowledges receipt of payment for work performed or materials provided and acknowledges that this waiver may be relied upon by the owner even if the undersigned accepts payment in uncertified funds and such payment is subsequently dishonored or revoked, in which case this lien waiver shall remain in full force and effect. The foregoing waiver shall not apply, however, if payment tendered by the owner is dishonored or revoked. By: subcontractor/materialman/employee Title: Date: STATE OF COUNTY OF ss. This instrument was acknowledged before me on this day of, 20, by (name of person) as lien claimant or (title, position or type of authority granted by lien claimant) of (lien claimant). IN WITNESS THEREOF, I have hereunto set my hand and affixed my official seal on the day and year last above written. Notarial officer My Commission Expires: Seal:

Click to view

History.

Laws 2010, ch. 92, § 1.

§ 29-10-102.
Form for notice of intention to file lien.

Notice of intention to file a lien shall be sent to the record owner of the property against which the lien may be filed or his agent and shall be completed in substantially the following form:

Note to lien claimant: This form, if filled out correctly and sent within the time periods specified in W.S.

29-2-107

constitutes prima facie evidence that you have provided the contents of the notice required by W.S.

29-2-107

(a). If you have any questions regarding how to fill out this form or whether it has been filled out properly, you should consult an attorney. CERTIFIED MAIL, RETURN RECEIPT REQUESTED To: Record owner or agent of owner (note: If there is more than one (1) owner, use a form for each owner) Date: , 20 Re: Notice of Intention to File Lien You are hereby notified pursuant to that intends to file a lien against your property. W.S. 29-2-107 (hereinafter the “lien claimant”) The amount of the lien claim is $ This amount is due from pursuant to a contract with the lien claimant under which the lien claimant performed work or supplied materials for the work. (person/entity whose actions have caused a lien to be filed) If we are unable to resolve this matter within twenty (20) days from the date of this notice, the lien claimant intends to file the lien statement asserting a lien against your property. cc:

Click to view

History.

Laws 2010, ch 92 § 1; 2011, ch. 130, § 1; 2013 ch. 150, § 1, effective July 1, 2013.

Effective dates. —

Laws 2010, ch. 92, § 5, makes the act effective July 1, 2011.

The 2011 amendment,

effective July 1, 2011, in (a), substituted “twenty (20) days” for “thirty (30) days” in the form.

The 2013 amendment,

effective July 1, 2013, substituted “or his agent” for “sent to the lien claimant” in (a).

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

§ 29-10-103.
Form of notice of filing lien.

Notice of filing a lien shall be sent to the record owner of the property against which the lien shall be filed and shall be completed in substantially the following form:

Note to lien claimant: This form, if filled out correctly and sent within the time periods specified in constitutes prima facie evidence that you have provided the content of the notice required by . If you have any questions regarding how to fill out this form or whether it has been filled out properly, you should consult an attorney. W.S.

29-2-107

W.S.

29-1-312

(c) CERTIFIED MAIL, RETURN RECEIPT REQUESTED To: Record owner or agent of owner (note: If there is more than one (1) owner, use a form for each owner) Date:, 20 Re: Notice of Filing Lien This letter shall serve as notice to you pursuant to that (hereinafter the “lien claimant”) has filed a lien against your property. W.S.

29-1-312

cc:

Click to view

History.

Laws 2010, ch. 92, § 1.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

§ 29-10-104.
Form for lien statement.

The lien statement shall be filed with the county clerk’s office in the county where the property against which the lien is filed is located and shall be completed in substantially the following form:

Note to lien claimant: This form, if filled out correctly and filed with the county clerk's office within the time periods specified in constitutes prima facie evidence that you have provided the content of the lien statement required by and (f). If you have any questions regarding how to fill out this form or whether it has been filled out properly, you should consult an attorney. W.S.

29-2-106

W.S.

29-1-312

(b) STATE OF COUNTY OF ss. LIEN STATEMENT Pursuant to the provisions of relating to lien statements, the undersigned hereby files this lien statement and swears as follows: W.S.

29-1-312

1. Name and address of lien claimant: 2. The amount claimed to be due and owing: $, plus pre-judgment interest at a rate of % (if applicable), and attorneys' fees and costs incurred by lien claimant in the collection of this amount. 3. The names and addresses of the persons against whose properties the lien is filed include: 4. An itemized list setting forth and describing the work performed or materials furnished by the lien claimant: The amounts due and owing from for the work performed and/or materials provided are set forth in the actual invoices, or if no invoices exist, then a summary, attached hereto as Exhibit “A”. 5. The name of the persons whom the lien claimant asserts is/are obligated to pay the debt secured by the lien: 6. The lien claimant last performed work, or furnished materials, for which the lien claimant asserts a lien on the day of , 20. 7. The legal description of the real property where the lien claimant performed work or furnished materials is set forth in Exhibit “B”, attached hereto. 8. A true and accurate copy of the written contract, if available, under which the lien claimant performed work or furnished materials is attached hereto as Exhibit “C”. If the contract was oral or is too extensive, the parties to the contract and contract terms are described below: A copy of the written contract, if applicable, is located at the following address: DATED this day of , 20. Name of lien claimant: By: Signature: Title: Note to Notarial officer: If the lien claimant is a legal entity formed under Title 17 of the Wyoming Statutes or other applicable law, use the first jurat. If the lien claimant is an individual or sole proprietor, use the second jurat. (Alternative 1:) STATE OF COUNTY OF ss. On this day of , 20, subscribed and sworn to before me personally appeared (name of signatory), to me personally known, who has read the foregoing Lien Statement and knows the contents thereof and the facts are true to the best of his/her knowledge, and being by me duly sworn, did state that he/she is the (title, position or type of authority granted by lien claimant) of (lien claimant) and that this lien statement was signed and sealed on behalf of the lien claimant by authority granted to the signatory by the lien claimant. Witness my hand and official seal. Notarial officer My Commission Expires: Seal: (Alternative 2:) STATE OF COUNTY OF ss. On this day of, 20, subscribed and sworn to before me personally appeared (name of signatory), to me personally known, who has read the foregoing Lien Statement and knows the contents thereof and the facts are true to the best of his/her knowledge, and being by me duly sworn, did state that the lien statement to be the free act and deed of the lien claimant. Witness my hand and official seal. Notarial officer My Commission Expires: Seal:

Click to view

History.

Laws 2010, ch. 92, § 1.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

§ 29-10-105.
Form for notice of substantial completion of the project.

The form for notice of substantial completion of the project may be filed with the county clerk in the county where the project is located in accordance with W.S. 29-2-106(c). After the notice has been duly recorded, the record owner shall send a copy of the notice to all contractors, subcontractors and materialmen who provided the record owner with preliminary notice pursuant to W.S.

29-2-112

within five (5) days after recording the notice under this section. The form shall be completed in substantially the following form:

(In bold face type) This notice creates a presumption under that the period for filing a lien shall begin to run on the date the notice was recorded. If the recipient of the notice has not been paid in full, any lien to be filed on the property to secure full payment shall be filed by contractors within one hundred fifty (150) days of the date the notice was recorded and within one hundred twenty (120) days the notice was recorded for materialmen. W.S. 29-2-106(c) STATE OF COUNTY OF ss. NOTICE OF SUBSTANTIAL COMPLETION OF THE PROJECT Pursuant to the provisions of , the undersigned hereby files its notice of substantial completion of the project, filed with the Clerk of County on the day of , 20 , commencing at Page of Book . W.S. 29-2-106(c) Dated this day of , 20 . Name of record owner: By: Signature: Title: Note to Notarial Officer: If the record owner is a legal entity formed under Title 17 of the Wyoming Statutes or other applicable law, use the first jurat. If the record owner is an individual or sole proprietor, use the second jurat. (Alternative 1:) STATE OF COUNTY OF ss. On this day of , 20 , subscribed and sworn to before me personally appeared (name of signatory), to me personally known, who has read the foregoing Notice of Substantial Completion of the Project and knows the contents thereof and the facts are true to the best of his/her knowledge, and being by me duly sworn, did state that he/she is the (title, position or type of authority granted by record owner) of (record owner) and that this Notice of Substantial Completion of the Project was signed and sealed on behalf of the record owner by authority granted to the signatory by the record owner. Witness my hand and official seal. Notarial officer My Commission Expires: Seal: (Alternative 2:) STATE OF COUNTY OF ss. On this day of , 20 , subscribed and sworn to before me personally appeared (name of signatory), to me personally known, who has read the foregoing Notice of Substantial Completion of the Project and knows the contents thereof and the facts are true to the best of his/her knowledge, and being by me duly sworn, did state that the Notice of Substantial Completion of the Project to be the free act and deed of the record owner Witness my hand and official seal. Notarial officer My Commission Expires: Seal:

Click to view

History.

Laws 2010, ch. 92, § 1.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

§ 29-10-106.
Form for notice of satisfaction of lien.

The form for notice of satisfaction of a lien shall be filed with the county clerk’s office in the county where the property against which the lien was filed is located, sent to the record owner and shall be completed in substantially the following form:

Note to lien claimant: This form, if filled out correctly and filed with the county clerk's office within the time period specified in constitutes prima facie evidence that you have fulfilled your obligation to file a notice of satisfaction of the lien required by and . If you have any questions regarding how to fill out this form or whether it has been filled out properly, you should consult an attorney. W.S.

29-1-314

W.S.

29-1-313

29-1-314

STATE OF COUNTY OF ss. NOTICE OF SATISFACTION OF LIEN Pursuant to the provisions of , the undersigned hereby files its notice of satisfaction of lien statement and hereby releases its lien(s), filed with the Clerk of County on the day of , 20 , commencing at Page of Book . W.S.

29-1-313

Dated this day of , 20 . Name of lien claimant: By: Signature: Title: Note to Notarial Officer: If the lien claimant is a legal entity formed under Title 17 of the Wyoming Statutes or other applicable law, use the first jurat. If the lien claimant is an individual or sole proprietor, use the second jurat. (Alternative 1:) STATE OF COUNTY OF ss. On this day of , 20 , subscribed and sworn to before me personally appeared (name of signatory), to me personally known, who has read the foregoing Notice of Satisfaction of Lien and knows the contents thereof and the facts are true to the best of his/her knowledge, and being by me duly sworn, did state that he/she is the (title, position or type of authority granted by lien claimant) of (lien claimant) and that this Notice of Satisfaction of Lien was signed and sealed on behalf of the lien claimant by authority granted to the signatory by the lien claimant. Witness my hand and official seal. Notarial officer My Commission Expires: Seal: (Alternative 2:) STATE OF COUNTY OF ss. On this day of , 20 , subscribed and sworn to before me personally appeared (name of signatory), to me personally known, who has read the foregoing Notice of Satisfaction of Lien and knows the contents thereof and the facts are true to the best of his/her knowledge, and being by me duly sworn, did state that the Notice of Satisfaction of Lien to be the free act and deed of the lien claimant. Witness my hand and official seal. Notarial officer My Commission Expires: Seal:

Click to view

History.

Laws 2010, ch. 92, § 1.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.